tr: Elektrikli sürüş aracı kontrol seçenekleri: Uygulama kontrolü; Ayak pedalı gazı; İleri/geri vites anahtarı; Gidon gazı; Çoklu hız modları; Ebeveyn uzaktan kumanda müdahalesi; Direksiyon; Diğer
nl: Elektrisch rijvoertuig bedieningsopties: App-bediening; Gaspedaal; Schakelaar vooruit/achteruit; Gashendel; Meerdere snelheidsstanden; Ouderlijke afstandsbediening met override; Stuurwiel; Overige
en: Electric riding vehicle control options: App control; Foot pedal accelerator; Forward/Reverse switch; Handlebar throttle; Multiple speed modes; Parent remote control override; Steering wheel; Other
ja: 電動乗用車の制御オプション: アプリ制御; フットペダルアクセル; 前進/後進スイッチ; ハンドルバースロットル; 複数速度モード; 保護者向けリモコンオーバーライド; ステアリングホイール; その他
bg-BG: Опции за управление на електрическо превозно средство: Управление чрез приложение; Ускорител с крачен педал; Превключвател за напред/назад; Ускорител на кормилото; Множество режими на скоростта; Дистанционно управление за родителски контрол; Волан; Друго
el: Επιλογές ελέγχου οδήγησης ηλεκτρικού οχήματος: Έλεγχος μέσω εφαρμογής; Επιταχυντής με πεντάλ ποδιού; Διακόπτης κίνησης εμπρός/πίσω; Γκάζι τιμονιού; Λειτουργίες πολλαπλών ταχυτήτων; Παράκαμψη τηλεχειριστηρίου από γονέα; Τιμόνι; Άλλο
ru: Варианты управления электрическим транспортным средством: Управление через приложение; Педаль акселератора; Переключатель вперед/назад; Ручка газа на руле; Несколько скоростных режимов; Родительский контроль (пульт ДУ); Рулевое колесо; Другое
pt-BR: Opções de controle de veículos elétricos de condução: Controle por app; Acelerador de pedal; Chave de avanço/marcha à ré; Acelerador de guidão; Vários modos de velocidade; Controle remoto parental de sobreposição; Volante; Outro
ko: 전동 승용 완구 제어 옵션: 앱 제어; 풋 페달 가속기; 전진/후진 스위치; 핸들바 스로틀; 다중 속도 모드; 부모용 원격 제어 오버라이드; 스티어링 휠; 기타
sl-SI: Možnosti upravljanja električnih vozil: Upravljanje prek aplikacije; Pedal za plin; Stikalo naprej/nazaj; Ročica za plin na krmilu; Več načinov hitrosti; Daljinski nadzor za starše; Volan; Drugo
ro-RO: Opțiuni de control al vehiculelor electrice: Control prin aplicație; Pedală de accelerație; Comutator Înainte/Înapoi; Accelerație pe ghidon; Mai multe moduri de viteză; Suprascriere prin telecomanda pentru părinți; Volan; Altele
nb: Kontrollalternativer for elektriske kjøretøy: App-kontroll; Fotpedal for gass; Frem/tilbake-bryter; Gasshåndtak; Flere hastighetsmoduser; Fjernkontroll for foreldreoverstyring; Ratt; Annet
de: Steuerungsoptionen des elektrischen Fahrzeugs: App-Steuerung; Fußpedal-Gas; Vorwärts-/Rückwärtsschalter; Lenker-Gasgriff; Mehrere Geschwindigkeitsmodi; Elterliche Fernbedienungsübersteuerung; Lenkrad; Sonstige
sk-SK: Možnosti ovládania elektrického jazdného vozidla: Ovládanie cez aplikáciu; Nožný akceleračný pedál; Prepínač vpred/vzad; Akcelerátor na riadidlách; Viacero rýchlostných režimov; Nadradené diaľkové ovládanie pre rodičov; Volant; Iné
pt-PT: opções de controlo de veículos elétricos de condução: Controlo por app; Acelerador de pedal; Interruptor marcha em frente/marcha-atrás; Acelerador de guiador; Vários modos de velocidade; Controlo remoto parental; Volante; Outra
it: Opzioni di controllo del veicolo elettrico: Controllo tramite app; Acceleratore a pedale; Interruttore avanti/indietro; Acceleratore a manubrio; Molteplici modalità di velocità; Controllo remoto dei genitori; Volante; Altro
fr: Options de commande du véhicule électrique à chevaucher: Contrôle par appli; Pédale d’accélération; Interrupteur marche avant/arrière; Accélérateur au guidon; Plusieurs modes de vitesse; Dérogation par télécommande parentale; Volant; Autre
hr-HR: Mogućnosti upravljanja električnim vozilom za vožnju: Upravljanje aplikacijom; Ubrzanje nožnom papučicom; Prekidač za naprijed/natrag; Gas na upravljaču; Više načina brzine; Preuzimanje kontrole roditeljskim daljinskim upravljačem; Upravljač; Ostalo
zh-CN: 电动代步车控制选项: 应用控制; 脚踏油门; 前进/后退开关; 车把油门; 多速度模式; 父母遥控覆盖; 方向盘; 其他
pl: Opcje sterowania elektrycznym pojazdem jeżdżącym: Sterowanie z aplikacji; Akcelerator w pedale; Przełącznik przód/tył; Manetka gazu w kierownicy; Wiele trybów prędkości; Zdalne sterowanie nadrzędne dla rodzica; Kierownica; Inne
sv: Styrningsalternativ för elektriska åkfordon: Appstyrning; Fotpedal för gas; Framåt/bakåt-omkopplare; Styrgas; Flera hastighetslägen; Föräldrafjärrkontroll med åsidosättande; Ratt; Övrigt
th: ตัวเลือกการควบคุมรถยนต์ไฟฟ้า: การควบคุมด้วยแอป; คันเร่งแบบเหยียบ; สวิตช์เดินหน้า/ถอยหลัง; คันเร่งที่แฮนด์; โหมดความเร็วหลายระดับ; รีโมทคอนโทรลสำหรับผู้ปกครอง; พวงมาลัย; อื่นๆ
es: Opciones de control de vehículos eléctricos de juguete: Control por app; Acelerador de pedal; Interruptor de avance/retroceso; Acelerador de manubrio; Múltiples modos de velocidad; Anulación por control remoto parental; Volante; Otro
fi: Sähköisen ajettavan lelun ohjausvaihtoehdot: Sovellusohjaus; Poljinkaasu; Suunnanvaihtokytkin; Ohjaustangon kaasu; Useita nopeustiloja; Vanhempien kaukosäädinohjaus; Ohjauspyörä; Muu
zh-TW: 電動騎乘車輛控制選項: App 控制; 腳踏板加速器; 前進/後退開關; 車把油門; 多段速度模式; 家長遙控優先; 方向盤; 其他
vi: Các tùy chọn điều khiển xe điện: Điều khiển qua ứng dụng; Bàn đạp ga; Công tắc tiến/lùi; Tay ga; Nhiều chế độ tốc độ; Điều khiển từ xa dành cho phụ huynh; Vô lăng; Khác
lt-LT: Elektrinės važiuojamos transporto priemonės valdymo parinktys: Valdoma programėle; Kojinio pedalo akceleratorius; Pirmyn / atgal jungiklis; Vairo greičio rankenėlė; Keli greičio režimai; Tėvų nuotolinio valdymo galimybė; Vairas; Kita
cs: Možnosti ovládání elektrických vozidel: Ovládání přes aplikaci; Nožní pedál akcelerátoru; Přepínač vpřed/vzad; Ruční akcelerátor na řídítkách; Více rychlostních režimů; Dálkové ovládání pro rodiče s prioritou; Volant; Jiné
hu: Elektromos járművezérlési lehetőségek: Alkalmazásvezérlés; Lábpedálos gáz; Előre/Hátra kapcsoló; Kormánygáz; Többféle sebességmód; Szülői távirányítós felülbírálás; Kormánykerék; Egyéb
da: Muligheder for styring af elektriske køretøjer: App-styring; Fodpedal til acceleration; Frem/tilbage-kontakt; Gashåndtag på styr; Flere hastighedstilstande; Forældrefjernbetjening med overstyring; Rat; Andet